Washington statutes.
RCW 38.12.015

Department organized into separate divisions—Army national guard—Air national guard—Assistant adjutants general.

The adjutant general's department shall be organized into separate divisions for the Washington army national guard and the Washington air national guard. Each division may have a general officer at its head who will be referred to as the assistant adjutant general for the Washington army national guard and the assistant adjutant general for the Washington air national guard.

[ 1961 c 210 s 2.]